Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.2 Water Facilities Assistance Program

46-15.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Water Facilities Assistance Program”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1.

46-15.2-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

A number of Rhode Island municipalities periodically suffer water shortages severe enough to require usage curtailments as a result of droughts.

The limited water supply systems and sources of these municipalities, burdened by rising water usage caused by growth and development, will encounter increasing difficulties coping with short-term climatologically caused shortages.

The quality of water supplies of a number of municipalities are threatened by development and by contamination.

Population growth, commercial and industrial development, and patterns of higher water consumption have forced some communities to abandon or supplement their inadequate or contaminated original sources of water, and to develop new supplies of water often located beyond their borders and outside their original service areas.

It has become evident that individual water systems serving the public often no longer have the financial resources to find and develop adequate new water supplies. The costs of constructing aqueducts, major transmission lines, and pumping stations to deliver water to communities from remote sources, and the difficulties in acquiring rights-of-way, overwhelm most communities and indicate the need for state involvement.

Water of high quality is a sufficiently abundant resource in Rhode Island that enough water can be made available to meet all the needs of each Rhode Islander through the foreseeable future provided that water can be conveyed to the communities and water systems in need from remote sources.

The water resources board was established in 1967 and charged with the responsibility of acquiring and developing new major water supplies for the people of Rhode Island. The Rhode Island water facilities assistance program enables the water resources board to assist public water systems in obtaining and delivering potable water to meet present and future needs throughout the state of Rhode Island.

The water resources board and other existing agencies of state government have adequate capability and authority to carry out this program without the creation of new agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1.

46-15.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning:

“Distribution facilities” means the pipes and appurtenant facilities employed specifically to deliver, to dispense, to render, or to circulate potable water directly for the benefit of a consumer or a community of consumers.

“Intersystem facilities” means transmission facilities designed and constructed by the owner of any public water system having the capacity to serve two (2) or more water systems.

“Transmission facilities” means the pipes, pumping stations, and storage facilities required to carry potable water, or raw water to a treatment facility or storage facility for later treatment, from a water source to or throughout an area served or to be served by a public water system for the specific purpose of supplying water to support a general population. Transmission facilities shall not include the distribution system. Determinations concerning eligible transmission facilities for purposes of this program shall be made by the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 7; P.L. 1992, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 3.

46-15.2-4.
Water facilities assistance program established — Eligibility.

There is hereby established in the water resources board a Rhode Island water facilities assistance program. The board shall administer this program so as to ensure the proper and systematic development of coordinated water supply and transmission facilities and shall expend the funds available under this chapter in a manner that accomplishes this objective.

This program shall provide twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of approved water transmission facilities designed and constructed to serve a single water system, and shall provide fifty percent (50%) of the cost of approved intersystem facilities. Only the construction of water transmission and intersystem facilities and the acquisition of land or rights-of-way, together with necessary engineering and design, are eligible for assistance under this program. Costs of borrowing, amortization costs, legal, and all other costs attendant to the funding of water transmission and intersystem facilities are not eligible for financial assistance under this program and must be fully borne by the project applicant. The cost of distribution facilities as defined in this chapter are not eligible for financial assistance under this program. Determinations of project eligibility shall be made by the water resources board.

Only municipalities and quasi municipal water agencies are eligible to apply for assistance under this program. Determinations of applicant eligibility shall be made by the water resources board.

Only projects reviewed and approved by the water resources board, the division of public utilities and carriers, and the state planning council may be funded. Each project supported by this program must be consistent with a plan adopted and kept current by the water resources board in accordance with §

46-15-6

and with applicable elements of the state guide plan, as adopted and kept current by the state planning council in accordance with §

42-11-10(c)

; provided, however, that with respect to any project which has been approved by the board and which thereafter becomes eligible to participate as an intersystem facilities project, the submission to, and approval by, the public utilities commission and statewide planning council shall not be required.

Each transmission facility supported by this program must link a water source with a water distribution system, both of which are complete and operational or will be so at the time that the transmission facility is completed or is projected for future construction. The capacity of both the water source and the distribution system must be adequate to meet present and future needs, considering all other demands that may be placed on the same sources and distribution systems. All determinations required under this subsection shall be made in a timely fashion by the water resources board.

The quality of water to be conveyed through the proposed transmission system must meet the Rhode Island department of health requirements for the most restrictive current or planned use. All reasonable measures to assure that this level of water quality will be maintained must have been taken.

The design and construction of an approved transmission facility must ensure that it will remain operational for its design life with routine maintenance, and that it will resist all external and internal forces that can be reasonably anticipated as determined by the water resources board.

The water resources board will ensure that maintenance of the transmission facility is performed in a manner that ensures that it will remain operational throughout its design life and is assured by a dedicated revenue such as a user fee or some other equally reliable means.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 28, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 50.

46-15.2-5.
Application to assistance program.

Applicants shall submit projects proposed for assistance under this program to the water resources board, in the form and content prescribed by the board. The board shall coordinate the review and disposition of all applications by all agencies concerned in an expeditious manner. The board shall incorporate the information required by all agencies to conduct their review of proposals in its application documents.

Upon receipt of an application, the board shall determine whether the application is complete and contains all necessary information. Incomplete applications shall be returned to the applicants. Complete applications shall be formally acknowledged by the board.

The board shall forward a copy of each application accepted to the division of public utilities and carriers, to the state planning council, to the department of health and to the department of environmental management. Review of applications by these agencies shall be conducted concurrently.

The water resources board shall evaluate each application to determine whether all requirements of §§

46-15-1

and

46-15-3

have been met, and shall further ensure that:

Design and engineering of the project are sound, as provided in §

46-15.2-4(g)

;

The applicant has adequately demonstrated that a need exists in its community for the water that would be provided by the project;

The project links a water source with a water distribution system, as set forth in §

46-15.2-4(e)

;

The distribution system owned or to be owned by the applicant has or will continue to have sufficient capacity to carry the projected volumes of water, as set forth in §

46-15.2-4(e)

;

The proposed water source is adequate to meet the applicant’s needs and will have sufficient capacity to serve all future demands imposed by the applicant in combination with all other users, as set forth in § 46-15.2-4(e);

The quality of the water meets the standards established by the Rhode Island department of health water quality regulations for the purpose intended, as provided in §

46-15.2-4(f)

;

The project incorporates sound conservation techniques as provided in §

46-15.1-5

; and

The project is properly related to all other water systems serving adjacent or nearby areas in terms of interconnections and mutual support.

The division of public utilities and carriers shall review the financing aspects of all projects, particularly with respect to costs that will be imposed on water users as a result of the project. The division shall perform an analysis of the proposed costs and benefits of the project and shall, on the basis of its findings, make a determination as to whether approval of the project is in the best interests of the water users. If the division determines the project is in the best interests of the water users, it shall approve the project. If the division determines that the project is not in the best interests of the water users, it shall disapprove the project. Since the division’s review must be based on estimated costs and interest rates, the full financing costs will not be precisely known. The absence of specificity concerning the finance of costs must be considered by the division.

The state planning council shall review all proposed projects to determine whether they are consistent with all relevant elements of the state guide plan. Upon determination that a project is consistent with all relevant elements of the state guide plan, the state planning council shall render its approval. Upon a determination that the project is not consistent with all relevant elements of the state guide plan, the council shall disapprove the project. The state planning council will provide the policy framework necessary to guide this program through the state guide plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 7; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 3.

46-15.2-6.
Decision on application and financing.

Except as provided in §

46-15.2-4(d)

with respect to intersystem facilities, no project shall be approved by the water resources board unless the project has been approved by the division of public utilities and carriers, as set forth in §

46-15.2-5(e)

, by the state planning council, as set forth in §

46-15.2-5(f)

, and by the department of the environmental management. The water resources board shall approve the project based upon its finding of fact, as provided in §

46-15.2-5(d)(1)

through (d)(8), and upon approval by the division of public utilities and carriers, the state planning council, and the department of the environmental management. A project disapproved by either the division of public utilities and carriers, the state planning council, the department of health or the department of environmental management shall not be approved by the water resources board.

The water resources board shall not approve a transmission facility project and intersystem facility project unless the applicant first adequately demonstrates that its seventy-five percent (75%) share or fifty percent (50%) share, as the case may be, of the project cost is available and obligated to the project.

The water resources board shall not approve a project unless sufficient state funds to provide the state’s share of the project cost are available.

The water resources board shall ensure that the state’s share of a project cannot be used by or transferred to a private or investor-owned water company.

Upon approval of a proposed project as set forth in §

46-15.2-5

, the water resources board shall so notify the applicant and shall establish the amount of state participation in the project representing the appropriate state share of eligible costs as determined from the application. Costs incurred in excess of those set forth in the application shall not automatically increase the amount of state participation. However, the applicant may submit a subsequent proposal, in accordance with §

46-15.2-4

and

46-15.2-5

, that requests state participation in those costs. If the project is completed at a cost below that set forth in the application, the amount of state participation shall be reduced proportionately.

The water resources board shall establish a schedule by which state funds shall be paid to the applicant that ensures that funds are disbursed only when required for the project.

The water resources board is empowered to issue rules and regulations to provide proper security for the state’s grant-in-aid for each approved project.

The water resources board may condition the approval of any intersystem facilities project on the applicant agreeing that it will not charge any water system which uses such a facility an amount in excess of its costs for purchase, production, and transmission of water to the user, and an appropriate portion of its cost of repair, maintenance, and replacement of the facility based upon the capacity allocated to the user.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 28, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 7; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 3.

46-15.2-7.
Project execution.

The water resources board shall determine the priority and scheduling of all projects assisted by this program, and shall ensure that all construction is properly managed and successfully completed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1.

46-15.2-8.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes hereof, and where any specific power is given to any agency by the provisions hereof, the statement thereof shall not be deemed to exclude or impair any power otherwise in this chapter conferred upon that agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1.

46-15.2-9.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, rule, regulation, or order, and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter, and it is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if the invalid parts had not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 332, art. II, § 1.